Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.09, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Report on dismissals with agreement of the prosecutor. new text end new text begin The Sentencing Guidelines Commission shall include in its annual report to the legislature a summary and analysis of reports received from county attorneys under section 388.052. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [388.052] REPORT ON CRIMINAL CHARGES AND CASES DISMISSED. new text end new text begin (a) In each case where the defendant is charged with a felony, a county attorney who dismisses any part of a criminal action pursuant to rule 30.01 of the Rules of Criminal Procedure shall record the following information in writing: new text end new text begin (1) the name of the defendant; new text end new text begin (2) the date of the offense; new text end new text begin (3) all crimes charged; new text end new text begin (4) any charges that were dismissed; new text end new text begin (5) whether the victim, if any, supports the dismissal; new text end new text begin (6) the date of dismissal; and new text end new text begin (7) any reason for the dismissal. new text end new text begin (b) The county attorney shall forward the information recorded under paragraph (a) to the Sentencing Guidelines Commission upon forms prescribed by the commission and must publish the information on the county attorney's publicly accessible website. Information forwarded to the Sentencing Guidelines Commission and posted on the county attorney's website must not include the identifying information of any victim. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to dismissals that take place on or after that date. new text end